Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE L. COURT PROFESSIONS REGULATION

CHAPTER 156. PROCESS SERVER CERTIFICATION

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 156.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Advisory board" means the Process Server Certification Advisory Board.

(2) "Certified process server" or "process server" means a person who is certified by the commission under order of the supreme court to serve process.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 42 (S.B. 966), Sec. 1.06, eff. September 1, 2014.

Redesignated from Government Code, Subtitle K, Title 2 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(21), eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (S.B. 43), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROCESS SERVER CERTIFICATION ADVISORY BOARD

Sec. 156.051. ORGANIZATION. (a) The Process Server Certification Advisory Board is established as an advisory board to the commission. The advisory board is composed of at least five members appointed by the supreme court.

(b) Appointments to the advisory board shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointees.

(c) The supreme court shall appoint a presiding officer of the advisory board from among the advisory board members to serve for two years.

(d) A majority of the advisory board constitutes a quorum.

(e) Advisory board members serve staggered six-year terms as ordered by the supreme court.

(f) If a vacancy occurs on the advisory board, the supreme court shall appoint a person to serve the remainder of the term.

(g) Advisory board members serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses and other actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official advisory board duties, as provided by the General Appropriations Act.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 42 (S.B. 966), Sec. 1.06, eff. September 1, 2014.

Redesignated from Government Code, Subtitle K, Title 2 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(21), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 156.052. FEES FOR PROCESS SERVER CERTIFICATION. (a) The commission may recommend to the supreme court the fees to be charged for process server certification and renewal of certification. The supreme court must approve the fees recommended by the commission before the fees may be collected.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (S.B. 43), Sec. 35(5), eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) The office may collect the fees recommended by the commission and approved by the supreme court. Fees collected under this section shall be sent to the comptroller for deposit to the credit of the general revenue fund.

(d) Fees collected under this section may be appropriated to the office for the support of regulatory programs for process servers, guardians, and court reporters.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138 (H.B. 1614), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 7.01, eff. September 28, 2011.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Section 51.008 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 42 (S.B. 966), Sec. 1.07, eff. September 1, 2014.

Redesignated from Government Code, Subtitle K, Title 2 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(21), eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (S.B. 43), Sec. 35(5), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 156.053. PROCESS SERVER CERTIFICATION RENEWAL; FEES. Certification of a process server expires on the last day of the month in which the second anniversary of the date on which the certification was issued occurs unless it is renewed on or before that date. On renewal of certification, each process server must pay a fee to the commission in accordance with Section 152.2015.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (S.B. 43), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2017.